California statutes. Public Resources Code
(D) In meeting the requirements of subparagraphs (B) and (C), the PRO or producer shall provide documentation necessary to verify this certification and shall make the certification under penalty of perjury.

(5) The department’s regulations shall encourage recycling that
 minimizes generation of hazardous waste, generation of greenhouse gases, environmental impacts, environmental justice impacts, and public health impacts. The regulations shall include criteria to exclude plastic recycling technologies that produce significant amounts of hazardous waste.

(ab) “Recycling rate” means the percentage, overall and by category, of covered material sold, offered for sale, distributed, or imported in the state that is ultimately recycled. The recycling rate shall be calculated as the amount of covered material that is recycled in a given year divided by the total amount of covered material disposed of, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 40192, and the amount of covered material recycled, unless and until the department adopts a new methodology for calculating the recycling rate by regulation.

(ac) “Recycling service provider” means a solid waste
 enterprise that provides solid waste handling services on behalf of a local jurisdiction.

(ad) “Responsible end market” means a materials market in which the recycling and recovery of materials or the disposal of contaminants is conducted in a way that benefits the environment and minimizes risks to public health and worker health and safety. The department may adopt regulations to identify responsible end markets and to establish criteria regarding benefits to the environment and minimizing risks to public health and worker health and safety.

(ae) (1) “Retailer” or “wholesaler” means the person or entity who sells covered material in the state to purchasers or offers to purchasers the covered material in the state through any means, including, but not limited to, any of the following:

(A) Remote offering, including sales outlets or catalogs.

(B) Electronically through the internet.

(C) Telephone.

(D) Mail.

(E) Direct sales.

(2) A person who sells covered material as a third-party seller using an online marketplace as described in paragraph (3) shall be considered the retailer or wholesaler for purposes of such transactions. The owner or operator of the online marketplace shall not be considered the retailer or wholesaler for such sales.

(3) For purposes of this subdivision, “online marketplace” means a consumer-directed, electronically accessed platform in which all of the following are
 true:

(A) The platform includes features that enable third-party sellers to sell consumer products directly to consumers in the state without the owner or operator of the platform involved in the transaction other than by providing order processing, payment, storage, shipping, or delivery services.

(B) Third-party sellers use the features described in subparagraph (A) to sell directly to consumers in the state, with title to the consumer product passing from the third-party sellers directly to consumers and not being held by the owner or operator of the online marketplace at any point during the transaction, including upon receipt of the order and throughout the order fulfillment process.

(C) Except as provided by subparagraph (E), the owner or operator of the platform does not directly or indirectly control the
 covered material used in packaging and shipping of a consumer product in this state.

(D) The person or entity operating the platform has a contractual or similar relationship with consumers governing their use of the platform to purchase consumer products.

(E) Third-party sellers agree, pursuant to the platform’s terms and conditions or other enforceable agreement, that they will not use the platform to offer for sale, sell, or distribute into the state covered material that does not meet the requirements of this chapter.

(af) “Reusable” or “refillable” or “reuse” or “refill,” in regard to packaging or food service ware, means either of the following:

(1) For packaging or food service ware that is reused or refilled by a producer, it satisfies all of
 the following:

(A) Explicitly designed and marketed to be utilized multiple times for the same product, or for another purposeful packaging use in a supply chain.

(B) Designed for durability to function properly in its original condition for multiple uses.

(C) Supported by adequate infrastructure to ensure the packaging or food service ware can be conveniently and safely reused or refilled for multiple cycles.

(D) Repeatedly recovered, inspected, and repaired, if necessary, and reissued into the supply chain for reuse or refill for multiple cycles.

(2) For packaging or food service ware that is reused or refilled by a consumer, it satisfies all of the following:

(A) Explicitly designed and marketed to be utilized multiple times for the same product.

(B) Designed for durability to function properly in its original condition for multiple uses.

(C) Supported by adequate and convenient availability of and retail infrastructure for bulk or large format packaging that may be refilled to ensure the packaging or food service ware can be conveniently and safely reused or refilled by the consumer multiple times.

(ag) “Right-size” or “right-sizing” means reducing the amount of material used to package an item by reducing unnecessary space or eliminating unnecessary components of the packaging.

(ah) “Rural area” has the same meaning as defined in Section 50101
 of the Health and Safety Code.

(ai) “Single use” means conventionally disposed of after a single use or not sufficiently durable or washable to be, or not intended to be, reusable or refillable.

(aj) “Source reduction” means the reduction in the amount of covered material created by a producer relative to a baseline established pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 42057. Methods of source reduction include, but are not limited to, shifting covered material to reusable or refillable packaging or a reusable product or eliminating unnecessary packaging. “Source reduction” does not include either of the following:

(1) Replacing a recyclable or compostable covered material with a nonrecyclable or noncompostable covered material or a covered material that is less likely to be recycled or composted.

(2) Switching from virgin covered material to postconsumer recycled content.

(ak) “Source reduction plan” means the plan prepared as part of the PRO plan in accordance with Section 42057.

(al) “Unexpended funds” means moneys in a PRO’s accounts that the organization is not already obligated to pay pursuant to a contract, claim, or similar mechanism. “Unexpended funds” excludes the California circular economy administrative fees.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 989, Sec. 6.   (SB 1143)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Producer Responsibility [42050. - 42057.]

42050.

Consistent with the policy goal established in Section 41780.01 and consistent with the waste hierarchy established in Section 40051, producers of covered material sold, offered for sale, imported, or distributed in the state shall achieve all of the following with respect to the materials for which they are the producers:

(a) All plastic covered material is source reduced pursuant to the requirements established in Section 42057 and paragraph (6) of subdivision (a) of Section 42060.

(b) Ensure that all covered material offered for sale, distributed, or imported in or into the state on or after January 1, 2032, is recyclable in the state or eligible for being labeled “compostable” in accordance with
 Chapter 5.7 (commencing with Section 42355).

(c) Ensure that all plastic covered material offered for sale, distributed, or imported in or into the state achieves the following recycling rates:

(1) Not less than 30 percent of covered material on and after January 1, 2028.

(2) Not less than 40 percent of covered material on and after January 1, 2030.

(3) Not less than 65 percent of covered material on and after January 1, 2032.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 75, Sec. 2.   (SB 54)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

42051.

(a) By January 1, 2024, producers of covered material shall form and join a PRO for the purposes of complying with this chapter. The governing body of the PRO shall submit an application to the department describing how the PRO meets the requirements to be an approved PRO pursuant to this chapter, as described in Section 42061.5. If the department approves the PRO, the PRO shall proceed to carry out the requirements of this chapter. If applications for more than one PRO are submitted to the department by January 1, 2024, the department shall determine which proposed PRO can most effectively implement this chapter.

(b) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), upon approval of a plan pursuant to Section 42063, or commencing January 1, 2027,
 whichever is sooner, a producer shall not sell, offer for sale, import, or distribute covered materials in the state unless the producer is approved to participate in the plan of a PRO that is approved by the department for the source reduction, collection, processing, and recycling of covered material to meet the requirements of this chapter. If an entity does not qualify as a producer and is not subject to this chapter before January 1, 2027, but, after January 1, 2027, becomes a producer by beginning to sell, offer for sale, import, or distribute covered material in the state, the producer shall, within six months, become a participant of the PRO and comply with this chapter.

(2) (A) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), a producer may comply with this chapter individually without participating in a PRO’s plan if the producer can demonstrate to the department, and the department determines at its sole discretion, that the
 producer meets all of the following criteria or can demonstrate a recycling rate of 65 percent for three consecutive years prior to January 1, 2027, and on and after that date demonstrates a recycling rate at or over 70 percent annually:

(i) From the 2013 calendar year to the 2022 calendar year, inclusive, the producer achieved a net 5 percent or greater source reduction of its covered materials through shifting to refill, reuse, or elimination.

(ii) From the 2013 calendar year to the 2022 calendar year, inclusive, the producer achieved a net 8 percent or greater source reduction of its covered materials through optimization, concentration, right-sizing, bulking, shifting to a nonplastic packaging, or lightweighting, or increasing the number of consumer uses.

(iii) Seventy-five percent of the producer’s covered
 material sold, offered for sale, distributed, or imported into the state is in a covered material category that meets a 30-percent recycling rate as of January 1, 2023.

(B) A producer who chooses to comply with this chapter individually shall assume individual responsibility for complying with this chapter, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(i) Develop and implement a plan that meets all of the applicable requirements of a producer responsibility plan, including, but not limited to, the review, update, and approval process. The plan shall include a producer source reduction plan that meets all of the applicable requirements of a PRO source reduction plan prepared in accordance with subdivision (d) of Section 42057, including, but not limited to, the review, update, and approval process.

(ii) Fully
 cover the costs associated with implementing this chapter to the same extent as any other producer participating in a PRO based on the producer’s share of covered material.

(iii) Annually report sales, recycling, composting, and source reduction data to the department pursuant to Sections 42052 and 42057 in a manner determined by the department.

(c) Regardless of whether a producer participates in a PRO plan, each producer in the state shall file its primary business address with the department in a manner prescribed by regulation pursuant to this chapter. Each producer shall notify the department of any change in their business address within 30 days. A PRO may satisfy the requirements of this subdivision on behalf of a producer by including the producer’s primary business address in a plan, update, or annual report pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (a)
 of Section 42051.3 or otherwise notifying the department of the address and any changes of address.

(d) Each participant of a PRO with an approved plan shall comply with the requirements of this chapter. The PRO shall notify the department within 30 calendar days of any of the following:

(1) The end of any three-month period in which the PRO unsuccessfully attempted to obtain a fee, records, or information from a participant producer, or received incomplete or incorrect records or information pursuant to Section 42052 or 42053.

(2) The date a producer no longer participates in the PRO’s approved plan.

(3) Any instance of noncompliance by a participant producer.

(e) The PRO may organize
 itself into subcommittees or some other similar structure, including delineation by covered material category, to ensure sufficient focus on each covered material category to better enable each category to meet the recycling rates required in subdivision (c) of Section 42050.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 131, Sec. 183.   (AB 1754)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

42051.1.

(a) As a condition of producer responsibility plan approval, the PRO plan shall comply with the regulations adopted by the department pursuant to Section 42060. The PRO shall submit a plan and budget that includes the provisions necessary for the department to ensure producers covered under the plan comply with this chapter.

(b) The plan shall include all of the following:

(1) Actions and investments that the PRO will implement in order to meet the requirements of this chapter and address the needs and investments identified in the needs assessment.

(2) The source reduction plan required pursuant to Section 42057. For any covered
 material that is not reasonably anticipated by the PRO to achieve the requirements of this chapter, the PRO shall include in the plan a timeline and actions to discontinue use of the covered material category.

(3) Technologies and means that will be utilized to achieve recycling requirements, including demonstration that the means and technologies meet the conditions specified in subdivision (aa) of Section 42041.

(c) The plan shall include objective and measurable criteria whenever possible, and describe all of the following:

(1) How the PRO will meet the requirements of this chapter, including, but not limited to, how it will, in an economically efficient and practical manner, provide for the necessary infrastructure and viable responsible end markets to ensure the covered material will achieve the requirements of
 Section 42050 based on the needs assessments.

(2) How the PRO will support and achieve, and how the budget will fund, the collection, processing, recycling, or composting of, and the development of viable responsible end markets for, covered materials to meet the requirements of this chapter. This includes, but is not limited to, actions necessary to sort, segregate, break or flake, and process material to specifications for sale to a responsible end market. For purposes of this paragraph, “specifications” means the third-party purchasing specifications issued by a buyer or buyers of recycled materials for reprocessing into a new product.

(3) (A) How the plan is supplemental to, and not in conflict with, disruptive of, or adversely affecting, the performance of the solid waste network providing services in accordance with local solid waste handling
 requirements and the intent described in Section 40004, and how the PRO will leverage and utilize existing collection programs and recycling, composting, sorting, and processing infrastructure.

(B) Except as specified in subdivisions (b), (c), (d), and (e) of Section 42060.5, how the plan will be implemented in a manner utilizing solid waste collection programs and solid waste facilities as the designated system for the collection and processing of covered material.

(4) In accordance with Section 40059, how the plan and the activities undertaken pursuant to the plan will be implemented in compliance with state and local laws, rules, and regulations applicable to solid waste handling and in a manner that does not violate existing franchise agreements.

(5) How covered material will be collected, processed, and managed,
 and recycled, remanufactured, or composted, consistent with the goals, standards, and practices required by this chapter, including ensuring covered material collected for recycling will be transferred to viable responsible end markets for processing into new packaging or products, including, but not limited to, how the plan will enhance or expand viable responsible end markets in California including manufacturing.

(6) Arrangements with processors or recyclers to ensure that covered materials that are not collected through a curbside collection program or other local collection program are collected and recycled at a viable responsible end market, including any investment that will be made to cover the cost of the covered material being processed or recycled by processors or recyclers.

(7) Arrangements to establish and fund reuse or refill infrastructure, fund facility retrofits,
 or other needed infrastructure to eliminate plastic covered material, shift covered material from plastic to a nonplastic covered material category, or any other actions taken, or that will be taken, to implement the source reduction requirements pursuant to Section 42057.

(8) How postconsumer recycled content will be incorporated into covered material, including the amounts of postconsumer recycled content.

(9) How the plan will be implemented in a manner consistent with the waste hierarchy established in Section 40051.

(d) (1) The plan shall include a fee for participants of the PRO consistent with the provisions of Section 42053, set forth the calculation of the fee, and describe the process through which the PRO will collect the fee from producers that are participants of the PRO’s approved
 plan.

(2) The plan shall include a description of the fee structure and a schedule of the fees actually charged to producers who are participants of a PRO’s approved plan.

(e) The plan shall include efforts to use education and promotion to encourage proper participation in recycling and composting collection and reuse and refill systems. The PRO shall ensure coordination between these efforts and existing educational and promotional efforts. These may include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Education and engagement to reduce the rate of inbound contamination or unwanted materials.

(2) Outreach to obtain consistently high levels of public participation in and use of collection services and reuse and refill systems.

(3) Education and engagement with residents on proper recycling, composting, and reuse and refill behaviors.

(4) Support for increased statewide and local outreach needed to achieve the plan’s goals.

(f) The plan shall include a closure or transfer plan to settle the affairs of the PRO that ensures that producers who are participants of the PRO’s approved plan will continue to meet their obligations in the event of dissolution of the organization or revocation of a plan by the department and that describes a process for notifying the department, the advisory board, local jurisdictions, and any contractors of the dissolution. The closure or transfer plan shall provide for sufficient reserve funds in the trust fund or escrow account established pursuant to Section 42056 to allow the PRO to satisfy all obligations in the
 event of dissolution of the PRO until the participants of the PRO’s approved plan have become a participant of a different PRO’s approved plan.

(g) (1) The plan shall include a process for determining the costs that will be incurred by local jurisdictions, recycling service providers, alternative collection systems, and others under this chapter and shall include a mechanism and schedule for transferring the portion of the fee required by paragraph (7) of subdivision (c) of Section 42053 to local jurisdictions. The PRO shall determine the costs based on information provided by local jurisdictions, recycling service providers, and others under this chapter. Payment of these costs shall be reflected in the budget pursuant to subdivision (j).

(2) The plan shall include a process to resolve disputes for determining and paying the reasonable costs pursuant to
 paragraph (1) that arise between the PRO and a local jurisdiction or a recycling service provider. This process shall be reviewed by the advisory board to ensure the PRO covers costs related to this chapter and shall become effective upon plan approval by the department.

(h) The plan shall include the source reduction data specified in subdivision (c) of Section 42057.

(i) (1) The plan shall include consideration of the needs assessment and any recommended investments to meet the needs identified in the needs assessments and inform the budget.

(2) The budget shall not propose investing in activities in violation of Section 40004 or an agreement entered into pursuant to Section 40059 and shall include a mechanism to disburse funds for identified activities.

(3) The budget may include, but shall not be limited to, elements that will accomplish all of the following:

(A) Expanding access to or improvement of curbside collection services wherever feasible.

(B) Expanding access to dropoff recycling services or other mechanisms where curbside collection services are not feasible, or as necessary in order to supplement curbside collection services to achieve the requirements of this chapter.

(C) Expanding access to collection services in public spaces.

(D) Providing or facilitating deployment of innovative enhanced collection, composting, and recycling systems and innovative recycling systems within a recycling center or MRF that utilizes advanced
 technology, such as artificial intelligence and robotics, to improve the identification and sorting of covered materials, where feasible.

(E) Creation of on-premises access to recycling or composting services for multifamily residences.

(F) Funding, providing, or facilitating the efficient transport of materials from remote or rural areas to centralized sorting facilities, brokers, or viable responsible end markets.

(G) Enhancing existing materials recycling or composting infrastructure by developing a quality incentive payment, grants, and other mechanisms sufficient to cover the cost of separating, processing, baling, recycling, composting, remanufacturing, and transporting desired materials that meet viable responsible end market quality specifications, or for reducing the rate of inbound contamination to
 composting facilities.

(H) Infrastructure or other mechanisms needed to implement a source reduction plan, including, but not limited to, investments in reuse, refill, and composting infrastructure.

(I) Infrastructure or other activities needed to achieve recycling rates for all covered material under the plan and ensure covered material is recyclable or compostable.

(4) In developing the budget, the PRO may delineate investments the PRO will make based on covered material categories.

(j) (1) The plan shall include a budget designed to fully fund the costs necessary to implement this chapter. The budget shall include, but not be limited to, fully funding the plan and all other costs associated with implementing the plan, including,
 but not limited to, all of the following:

(A) Actions and investments identified in the plan to fund the budget and needs and investments identified in the needs assessments.

(B) Costs associated with this chapter incurred by local jurisdictions, recycling service providers, and other collection programs, and costs related to consumer outreach and education; the transportation of covered materials to a materials recovery facility, broker, or viable responsible end market; cleaning, sorting, aggregating, and baling covered materials as necessary to bring those materials to a viable responsible end market; waste stream sampling and reporting required by this chapter for local governments; costs incurred to educate ratepayers to improve the preparation and sorting of covered material; and improvements to collection, sorting, decontamination, remanufacturing, and other infrastructure
 necessary to achieve recycling rates. These costs include costs related to both curbside and noncurbside collection programs and may be varied based on population density, distance to a viable responsible end market, and other relevant factors.

(C) Reimbursing costs incurred by the department and the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration.

(D) Administering the PRO.

(E) Environmental mitigation activities associated with Section 42064.

(F) Investments to develop and sustain viable responsible end markets for each covered material category.

(G) Other investments necessary to implement the plan and achieve the source reduction, recyclability and compostability, recycling rate,
 and other requirements of this chapter, including, but not limited to, ensuring that plan implementation avoids and minimizes negative environmental or public health impacts on disadvantaged or low-income communities or rural areas.

(H) If reasonable and able to be discretely directed, funding derived from a material type may be spent on investments needed for that specific material type.

(2) A producer or PRO shall not expend revenue collected for implementation of the plan for any of the following purposes:

(A) To pay an administrative civil penalty pursuant to Section 42081.

(B) To pay costs associated with litigation between the producer or organization and the state.

(C) To compensate
 a person whose position is primarily representing the PRO relative to the passage, defeat, approval, or modification of legislation that is being considered by a local, state, or federal government body, nor shall the PRO use or permit the use of these funds for paid advertisement 30 calendar days prior to or during a legislative session for the purposes of encouraging the passage, defeat, approval, or modification of legislation that is being considered, or was considered during the previous legislative session.

(D) To subsidize, incentivize, or otherwise support incineration, engineered municipal solid waste conversion, the production of energy or fuels, except for fuels produced using anaerobic digestion of source separated organic materials, or other disposal activities.

(3) (A) A PRO shall not maintain total program reserves exceeding 60 percent of its
 annual operating expenses, consistent with the requirements of the Financial Accounting Standards Board’s Accounting Standards Update 2016-14, Not-for-Profit Entities (Topic 958), and any future updates to that standard.

(B) The department, in approving the annual PRO budget, may authorize the total reserves to be increased to up to 75 percent of the PRO’s annual operating expenses if the department determines the increase is necessary to implement the requirements of this chapter.

(C) If a PRO’s reserves exceed the amount specified in subparagraph (A) or (B), the department may require the PRO or a participant producer to increase spending on implementing the requirements of this chapter.

(k) Consistent with subdivision (l), as part of the plan, the PRO or a participant producer may rely on a range of means
 to collect and recycle or compost various categories of covered materials that are not collected and recycled or composted through a curbside collection program or other local collection program, including, but not limited to, dropoff recycling services and retailer take-back.

(l) (1) A plan shall include curbside recycling and composting collection for covered materials under any of the following circumstances:

(A) The category of covered materials can be made suitable for curbside collection and can be effectively sorted by the facilities receiving the curbside collected material for recycling or composting.

(B) The recycling facility providing processing and sorting service, in consultation with the local jurisdiction, agrees to include the category of covered materials as an accepted
 material for recycling or composting and agrees to collect and sort the material in a manner that achieves the quality necessary for recycling and remanufacturing or composting.

(C) The provider of the curbside collection and recycling or composting service agrees to the costs arrangement.

(2) If a MRF chooses to send material to another sorting facility for additional sorting and recycling of covered materials, the PRO shall provide the initial MRF a rebate based on criteria the PRO shall develop to cover transportation costs of the covered materials provided the covered material is free of toxic or hazardous materials.

(m) The plan shall include specific measures to ensure that producers participating in the plan comply with the requirements of the plan and this chapter. Those measures shall include, at a minimum,
 all of the following elements:

(1) Adequate incentives for compliance, including, but not limited to, fees for failing to provide accurate and timely information required to be provided to the PRO or otherwise materially violating requirements of the plan or this chapter. Notwithstanding the PRO’s assessment of a fee, the department may take enforcement action pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 42080) against individual producers or the PRO in violation of this chapter.

(2) Protocols to ensure that the PRO becomes aware, within a reasonable time, of producers’ violations of the requirements of the plan or this chapter.

(3) Criteria for determining when a producer’s performance merits terminating the producer’s participation in the PRO’s plan, and a process for making that determination.

(4) Record maintenance protocols requiring the PRO to maintain records sufficient to demonstrate whether each producer participating in the plan has complied with the requirements of the plan and this chapter for at least the previous three years. Those protocols shall ensure that all records remain reasonably accessible by the department upon request.

(5) The plan shall include the specific data information required under subdivision (c) of Section 42057.

(n) The PRO shall ensure that the plan implementation avoids or minimizes negative environmental or public health impacts on disadvantaged or low-income communities or rural areas and vulnerable communities outside the state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 848, Sec. 6.   (AB 1526)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

42051.2.

(a) Before submitting the plan to the department for approval, the PRO shall submit a proposed plan to the advisory board for review and comment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 42070. The advisory board may provide written comments within 60 calendar days. The PRO shall consider the comments, along with any public comments, and may incorporate these comments into the plan.

(b) (1) The PRO shall submit the plan to the department with revisions, if any, in response to comments by the advisory board or public within 120 calendar days of receipt of the advisory board’s comments.

(2) The department shall review the plan for compliance with this chapter.
 Within 90 calendar days of receipt of the plan from the PRO, the department shall, in accordance with Section 42063, respond with an approval, disapproval, conditional approval, request for additional information, or timeline for a decision on approval or disapproval.

(3) If the department conditionally approves the plan pursuant to paragraph (2), the department shall explain, in writing, how the plan or parts of the plan does not comply with this chapter, and the PRO shall ensure the conditions are met and resubmit a revised plan within 12 months.

(4) If the department disapproves the plan pursuant to paragraph (2), the department shall explain, in writing, how the plan does not comply with this chapter, and the PRO shall resubmit a plan to the department. If the department finds that the plan resubmitted by the PRO does not comply with the requirements of this chapter, the PRO
 shall not be deemed in compliance with this chapter until the organization submits a plan that the department finds complies with the requirements of this chapter.

(5) The approved plan shall be a public record, except that financial, production, or sales data reported to the department by the PRO is not a public record for purposes of the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code) and shall not be open to public inspection. The department shall release financial, production, or sales data in summary form only so the information cannot be attributable to a specific producer, retailer, or wholesaler, or to any other entity.

(c) Within 90 calendar days after approval or conditional approval of the plan by the department, the PRO shall implement the approved plan and post the plan on the PRO’s internet website.

(d) (1) Except as provided in subdivision (e), a plan approved by the department under this section is valid for five years.

(2) No less than 180 calendar days before a plan’s five-year expiration date, the PRO shall submit a proposed updated plan to be reviewed by the advisory board and approved by the department for an additional five years. An updated plan submitted for approval under this paragraph shall satisfy the requirements of this chapter, including Section 42051.1, and describe any changes from the previously approved plan. The department may allow for an extension of a previously approved plan until a plan submitted under this paragraph is approved or rejected.

(e) (1) An amendment to the plan that modifies actions to meet the obligations set forth in Section
 42050, modifies the setting and collection of fees, changes the implementation of this chapter with respect to costs incurred by local governments or recycling service providers, or changes the funding of costs to implement the plan, including costs to source reduce covered material, shall not be made to an approved plan unless the proposed amendment is submitted to the advisory board for comment, and approved by the department. That submission and review shall be conducted according to the same process set forth in subdivision (d).

(2) The department’s rejection or revocation of a plan or plan amendment submitted for approval under this section does not relieve the PRO or a participant producer from its obligations pursuant to the previously approved plan or the requirements of this chapter.

(3) The submission of a plan amendment for approval under this section does not relieve
 the PRO or a participant producer from its obligations pursuant to the approved plan prior to action by the department on the plan amendment.

(4) The department may approve or disapprove a proposed plan amendment based on a determination of whether the amendment is sufficient to result in actions reasonably likely to meet the requirements of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 75, Sec. 2.   (SB 54)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

42051.3.

(a) (1) A PRO shall annually submit to the department and make publicly available on its internet website an annual report and budget that describes how the PRO is implementing the approved plan and how the PRO has complied with the requirements of this chapter and its implementing regulations.

(2) The annual report shall describe in detail progress made toward meeting or exceeding the requirements in Section 42050 and shall include an evaluation of whether the PRO is reasonably likely to meet those requirements. If the PRO is not reasonably likely to meet those requirements, the PRO shall submit to the department an amendment to the plan to include additional measures to be implemented to ensure the requirements are
 met.

(3) The annual report shall include all of the following:

(A) The PRO’s cost and revenues, including an updated budget and any updates to the fee schedule necessary to ensure the revenues are sufficient to cover the full costs of implementing this chapter in the upcoming year.

(B) An updated list of the names and contact information of each participant of the plan.

(C) A description of outreach efforts and education to consumers.

(D) A report on activities the PRO has taken to implement each provision of the plan, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(i) A description of the methods used to collect,
 transport, process, and recycle or compost covered material.

(ii) The recycling technologies and means that will be utilized to achieve recycling requirements, including demonstration that the means and technologies meet the conditions specified in subdivision (aa) of Section 42041.

(iii) Progress made in meeting source reduction goals.

(iv) Current recycling rates and progress made in meeting recycling rates and any investments made to achieve recycling rate requirements.

(E) The source reduction data specified in subdivision (c) of Section 42057.

(b) (1) Within 90 calendar days of receiving an annual report, the department shall, in accordance with Section 42063,
 review the report and notify the PRO of any deficiencies in the annual report. No later than 60 calendar days after receiving this notice from the department, the PRO shall provide additional information, modifications, or corrections in response to the department’s notification.

(2) Within 90 calendar days of receipt of an annual report deemed complete, the department shall review the report for compliance with this chapter and shall approve, disapprove, or conditionally approve the annual report. As part of this review, the department shall evaluate the annual report to determine whether the PRO, in light of its implementation of the plan and any amendments or pending amendments to the plan pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (e) of Section 42051.2, is reasonably likely to meet the requirements of the plan and this chapter.

(3) (A) If the department
 conditionally approves or disapproves the annual report, the PRO shall resubmit a revised annual report addressing the department’s written reasons for its decision within 30 calendar days of the conditional approval or disapproval.

(B) The department, within 60 calendar days from the date a PRO resubmits a revised annual report, shall approve or disapprove a final annual report.

(4) If the department disapproves a revised annual report submitted pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (3), the PRO may submit only one additional final annual report, subject to review in accordance with subparagraph (B) of paragraph (3), which shall include the revisions necessary for approval by the department.

(5) If a PRO fails to submit an annual report that obtains approval by the department, the department may deem the PRO no
 longer in compliance with this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 75, Sec. 2.   (SB 54)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

42052.
